California statutes. Water Code
At any time within 60 days from the filing of the copy of the assessment roll with the county treasurer, it may be amended by the board to correct errors either on its own initiative or at the instance of any land owner affected. The amendment shall be made by endorsement upon the assessment roll by the county treasurer upon the certification of the error to him by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Collection [47155. - 47157.]

47155.

The supplementary assessment shall be collected in the manner provided in this division for the collection of original assessments and the board may call the same as a whole or in installments from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47156.

The report of the commissioners allocating or spreading the original assessment levied for construction purposes and all assessment rolls for the original assessment or for supplementary assessments for construction purposes shall continue in force as the basis for allocating and spreading assessments for operation of the works of the project, or for the management and conduct of the works or of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47157.

All provisions of this division with respect to the levy and collection of assessments shall, so far as appropriate, be applicable to supplementary assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Charges [47180. - 47185.]

47180.

For the purpose of the care, operation, management, or improvement of such portions of the project as are in use, including salaries of officers and employees, and all other operating expenses, the board may in lieu (either in part or in whole) of levying assessments as in this chapter provided for, fix rates of tolls and charges for irrigation or available irrigation and other services rendered by the district, including the use of ground water, and collect the same from all persons receiving the benefit of the irrigation or other services. The tolls and charges shall be proportional as nearly as possible to the service rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 260.)
-------------------------------------------

47181.

Whenever any tolls or charges for the use of the water or for other services rendered by the district provided for by this division have been fixed by the board, they may be made payable in advance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47182.

In case any tolls or charges remain unpaid for a period of 30 days after they become payable, they become delinquent and a penalty of 10 percent shall be added thereto, and they bear interest at the rate of 12 percent per year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47183.

After any toll or charge becomes delinquent, the board may file in the office of the county recorder of the county in which is situated the land as to which such tolls or charges are delinquent, a list showing:

(a) The names of the owners of the land, if known, and if not known, a statement of that fact.

(b) A description of the land sufficient for identification.

(c) The amounts of tolls and charges which are delinquent.

Upon the filing of
 the list, the tolls and charges so listed, together with the penalties and interest thereon, shall become a lien upon the land as to which such tolls and charges are delinquent in the same manner and of the same character as the lien of a district assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47184.

The board may, at any time after any toll or charge provided for in this division has become delinquent, direct that proceedings be not taken to enforce the lien therefor, and in place of such proceedings bring suit in the name of the district against the delinquent to enforce collection of the delinquent toll or charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47185.

In the suit the district may recover the amount of the toll or charge, together with penalties and interest, and costs of suit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Assessments Upon Which Bonds Have Been Issued [47300. - 47379.]



  ARTICLE 1. Lien and Additional Assessments [47300. - 47305.]

47300.

The lien of any unpaid assessment upon which bonds have been issued continues until all the bonds have been paid in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47301.

If for any reason any part of the principal or interest of the bonds remains unpaid after enforcement of the assessment as provided in this division, the board shall order an additional or supplemental assessment to be made as provided in this division sufficient to pay the unpaid principal and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47302.

The additional or supplemental assessment shall be enforced and collected in the same manner as the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47303.

Where bonds of the district have been authorized to be issued on the assessments, all unpaid assessments bear interest at the rate of 7 percent per year from the date of the bonds issued thereon until the bonds have been fully paid and discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47304.

The interest due at any time on unpaid assessments may be called without calling any installment of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47305.

The word installment as used in this chapter shall be construed as applying to interest as well as to principal, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Levy and Collection [47325. - 47327.]

47325.

At least 90 days before any interest date of the bonds, the treasurer of the district shall certify to the county treasurer of each affected county an estimate of the amount of money and the percentage of the assessment together with the interest thereon, or only of the interest, necessary to pay interest and principal or the interest maturing on the interest date after crediting thereon the funds in the treasury applicable to the payment thereof, to be collected by such county treasurer, and shall add thereto 15 percent of such aggregate sum to cover possible delinquencies. In determining the amount of the funds in the treasury applicable to such payment and to be so
 credited, the treasurer of the district shall not take into account the bond reserve fund, if any, applicable thereto unless he is directed to do so by the board in accordance with the terms upon which the bond reserve fund was established.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

47326.

Each county treasurer shall cause to be published once a week for two successive weeks in the county of which he is county treasurer a notice substantially in the following form: 

(Name of water storage district.) Notice is hereby given that an installment of assessment (describing it) or (amount or proportion thereof including interest thereon or only for interest) is payable within 30 days from date by all assessed landowners of said district in the county of (name of county) to the treasurer of said county. All or any part of said installment of interest which remains unpaid on the (day fixed) will be delinquent, together
 with accrued interest thereon, with 10 percent of such installment and interest added as penalty. Dated, .(Signed) ,Treasurer of County.If no newspaper is published in the county, publication shall be made in a newspaper published in an adjoining county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47327.

If any part of the installment or any interest thereon remains unpaid at the expiration of 30 days from the date of the notice, it becomes delinquent, and 10 percent of the unpaid amount of the installment and interest shall be added thereto and collected by the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sale of Property [47350. - 47354.]

47350.

When any installment has become delinquent, the county treasurer shall, within 10 days, publish a notice in the county once a week for two successive weeks containing all the following:

(a) A description of each parcel of land within the county, as described on the assessment list, on which a delinquent installment is due.

(b) The name of the person to whom the installment is assessed, or if the owner is unknown, a statement of that fact.

(c) The amount of the installment delinquent
 on each parcel.

(d) The amount of interest on the delinquent installment, reckoned to the day of sale.

(e) The amount of the 10 percent penalty.

(f) A statement that each of the described parcels will be sold at public auction by the county treasurer in front of the county courthouse at a specified day and hour to pay the delinquent installment plus accrued interest and penalty. 

The day of sale shall not be less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of delinquency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47351.

At the time stated in the notice, the county treasurer shall sell each parcel of land described in the notice to the highest bidder, unless prior thereto he shall have received payment in full of the delinquent installment, together with interest and penalty. No bid for any parcel shall be accepted less than the aggregate sum then due on the installment thereon with interest and penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47352.

The sale shall be made for cash, except the treasurer may receive from any purchaser, at their face value in lieu cash, bonds of the district or their interest coupons, issued on the assessment and then matured or to mature within 60 days after the sale. Any bond or coupon received in payment for property sold by the county treasurer shall be canceled and filed by the county treasurer in the office of the treasurer of the district. If the entire amount of the bond or coupon tendered in payment is not required to complete payment of the purchase money, the county treasurer shall endorse thereon as paid the amount of the purchase money credited thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47353.

If no bid is made for any parcel at the sale equal to the amount of the installment delinquent thereon, with interest and penalty, the county treasurer shall bid in and sell the parcel to himself and his successors in office, as trustee of the bond fund of the district, as purchaser, for the amount of the installment, interest, and penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47354.

The county treasurer shall execute to each purchaser, including himself as trustee, a certificate of sale, and shall record a duplicate in the county recorder’s office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Redemption [47375. - 47379.]

47375.

Any person interested in property sold pursuant to this chapter may redeem it at any time within three years after the date of sale by paying to the county treasurer a sum equal to the purchase price stated in the certificate, with interest thereon at the rate of 12 percent per year from the date of sale to the date of redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47376.

If no redemption is made within three years, the county treasurer, upon demand and surrender of the certificate of purchase, shall execute to the purchaser, his heirs or assigns, a deed of conveyance of the parcel of land described in the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47377.

The deed shall convey the land to the grantee free and clear of all encumbrances, except state, county, and municipal taxes, assessments or taxes levied or assessed by or under statutory authority, and any district assessment, or portion thereof, remaining unpaid at the date of the sale, installments of which may be called and collected as provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47378.

No parcel sold and conveyed to the district shall thereafter be subject to sale by the county treasurer for delinquent installments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47379.

Every deed by a county treasurer purporting to be executed under this chapter shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of the matters therein recited, and of ownership by the grantee of the land therein described.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Amendatory Assessments [47400. - 47401.]

47400.

The board shall levy an amendatory assessment in the manner provided for original assessments in Chapter 2 of this part if the original assessment was one levied pursuant to Chapter 2 of this part and any of the following occur:

(a) Any land within the district is omitted from any assessment roll.

(b) Land appears in the assessment roll but is neither assessed nor stated not to be assessed.

(c) A final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction has held that any assessment is
 invalid as to any part of the land assessed.

This amendatory assessment shall be based upon a determination, as nearly as may be, of the amount the original assessment upon the land would have been except for the omission or invalidity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47401.

In case the assessment to be amended was not one made under Chapter 2 of this part, the board shall cause an amendatory assessment as to such land to be made upon the basis and in the manner in which the assessment to be amended was made. The proceedings for making, levying, and collecting such amendatory assessment shall be the same as those provided in this division for the making, levying, and collecting the assessment of which such assessment is amendatory. This assessment shall be made within two years after the making of the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Assessment of Included Land [47550. - 47552.]

47550.

Upon the inclusion of any land within a district pursuant to Chapter 2 of Part 10 of this division an assessment shall be levied upon the land, the amount of the assessment against each tract or parcel to be the amount, as nearly as can be determined, of all assessments, other than those levied under the authority of Chapter 7 of this part, which would have been levied against the tract or parcel if it had been included in the district from its organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47551.

The board shall appoint commissioners to make the assessment in the number and manner provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 46150) of Chapter 2 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 126.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

47552.

The assessment shall be made in the same manner and with the same incidents as an original assessment under Chapter 2 of this part, and all of the provisions of this division as to assessments shall, so far as they are applicable, apply to such assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Deduction of Power Revenues From Assessments [47700. - 47701.]

47700.

Upon the call of any assessment, or portion thereof, as provided in this division the board shall ascertain the total net revenue which has been derived by the district from the generation of electric power since the call of the last preceding assessment, or portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47701.

From the assessment called upon each tract of land which has been assessed for the costs of the properties comprising the portion of the project to be used for the generation of electric energy, there shall be deducted by the county treasurer of each affected county an amount equal to such proportion of the total net revenue ascertained to have been derived from the generation of electric energy as the portion of costs assessed under Chapter 2 of this part against the tract bears to the total of such costs. In making the deduction, fractions of cents upon each tract shall be disregarded and no error in the computation of the deduction shall invalidate any such
 call.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Cancellation and Refund of Unnecessary Assessments [47800. - 47810.]

47800.

When a district has levied an assessment and it appears to the board that the assesssment or some part thereof, together with the interest thereon, will provide an amount greater than is required to meet all obligations incurred or to be incurred for the purposes for which the assessment or part thereof was levied, the board may, by resolution, declare its intention to cancel all or any portion of the assessment, including any interest thereon, or all or any portion of such interest. For the purposes of this chapter, the term “assessment balance” means the assessment and the interest thereon, and the board, in the manner and subject to the limitations provided in this
 chapter, may cancel any part of such assessment balance, including all of the assessment and the interest thereon, a part of the assessment and the interest thereon, all of the interest on the assessment or a part of the interest on the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

47801.

In the resolution of intention the board shall specify the portion of the assessment balance proposed to be canceled and appoint a time not less than three weeks nor more than five weeks from the date of the resolution when it will hold a meeting and hear any objections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

47803.

A copy of the resolution of intention shall be published once a week for three successive weeks before the time appointed by the board for the meeting in a newspaper of general circulation in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 821.)
-------------------------------------------

47804.

Objections shall be written, verified, and filed with the secretary, and no objection shall be considered by the board or allowed in any other action or proceeding unless made in writing and filed with the secretary prior to the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 821.)
-------------------------------------------

47805.

At the meeting the board shall hear any evidence offered in support of the written objections, after which the board may, by resolution, cancel all or a part of the assessment balance to the extent that the board finds that the assessment balance will provide an amount greater than is required to meet all obligations incurred or to be incurred for the purposes for which the assessment was levied. The board shall specify in the resolution the portion of the assessment balance which is to be canceled with respect to each tract against which the assessment was levied, describing each tract as described in the assessment roll or by the number of the tract as used in the
 assessment role. In adopting a resolution to cancel the board may make such revisions in the original plan set forth in its resolution of intention as it sees fit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

47806.

When a resolution to cancel is adopted, a copy thereof, certified by the secretary, shall be attached to the assessment roll by the county treasurer of each county in which the assessment roll is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 128.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

47807.

When the resolution to cancel is attached to the assessment roll the secretary shall endorse upon the assessment roll after each tract assessed the amount of the assessment balance which has been canceled with respect to such tract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

47808.

When a landowner, in a district in which the board has canceled any assessment balance or portion thereof, has paid all or a part of his share of the canceled assessment balance or portion thereof, the board shall issue a warrant of the district in favor of the landowner in an amount equal to the paid portion of his assessment balance which was canceled, with such interest thereon as the board shall, by resolution, determine to be appropriate to recompense landowners who have paid their assessments for any benefit obtained by other landowners as a result of the cancellation of the interest otherwise payable on their assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

47809.

The warrants shall be payable out of the fund of the district into which the proceeds of the assessment had been paid. The board shall not cancel so much of an assessment balance as to leave insufficient funds for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

47810.

No assessment balance or part thereof shall be canceled pursuant to this chapter if bonds based thereon and secured thereby have been issued and remain unpaid and provision has not been made for the payment thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Alternate Provisions for Collection and Enforcement of District Assessments by the County [47900. - 47982.]



  ARTICLE 1. Collection of Assessments by the County [47900. - 47912.]

47900.

This chapter provides an alternative method for the collection and enforcement of district assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

47901.

The board may elect to avail itself of the assessor, auditor and tax collector of the county or counties in which the district is situated to collect assessments levied and called pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

47902.

The board shall declare its election by a resolution and shall file a certified copy of said resolution with the auditor, assessor, tax collector and treasurer of each county within which the district is situated on or before February 1, following the adoption of such resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

47903.

An election pursuant to Section 47902 is effective with respect to all assessments designated by the board to be collected pursuant to the provisions of this article and which were levied or called after February 1, next succeeding the date upon which the certified copy is filed. Thereafter, the assessments designated by the board shall be collected by the tax collectors of the county or counties in which the district is situated until the board, by resolution, elects otherwise. When the board elects otherwise, a certified copy of such resolution shall be filed with the auditor, assessor, tax collector and treasurer of each county within which the district is situated and
 it is effective, with respect to any assessments levied or called, after February 1, next succeeding the date upon which the certified copy is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

47904.

On or before the 15th day of July, the board shall designate and determine by resolution the percentage of any assessment theretofore levied that shall be called and collected pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

47905.

A certified copy of the resolution provided for in Section 47904 shall immediately be filed by the secretary of the district with the county treasurer and county auditor of each affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

47906.

The county treasurer, upon receipt of the certified copy of the resolution, provided for by Sections 47904 and 47905, shall forthwith discontinue making collections on the affected assessment and shall transfer to the county auditor the assessment rolls designated in the resolution together with an accounting of all payments made on the assessments so transferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

47907.

The county auditor, on receipt of said affected assessment rolls from the county treasurer, shall compute the amount to be collected from each parcel of land in the district held in separate ownership as shown on the transferred assessment rolls and the county tax roll, and shall enter in a separate column in the county assessment books, headed “Water Storage District Assessment, ____ Water Storage District (naming it),” the sums in dollars and cents to be collected against the respective parcels of land.

On any parcel of land on which payments have been made on such assessment prior to the receipt of the resolution by the county
 treasurer, credit for the amount so paid shall be given in determining the amount payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

47908.

Assessments called pursuant to this chapter shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected, the net amount, as provided by this chapter, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district, under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

47909.

Each county assessor, auditor, treasurer and tax collector shall file annually with the board of supervisors of his county, itemized statements showing the additional expenses to his office caused by performance of the duties imposed upon him by this chapter. Upon the filing of such statements the board of supervisors, by an order upon its minutes, shall deduct such expenses from the assessment money of the district while in the hands of such tax collector and transfer the amount deducted into the county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

47910.

The board of supervisors may provide extra help for their county offices or officers as in their judgment is necessary for the proper performance of their duties under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

47911.

Whenever any real property situated in any district which availed itself of county collection of assessments under this chapter has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid by the county treasurer receiving it, to the district in the proportion which the assessment due to the district shares to the total tax and assessment for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------

47912.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 47902 and 47903, any district organized pursuant to this division, which organization was completed prior to the effective date of this section, may, prior to July 1, 1963, adopt the resolution and file a certified copy thereof with the auditor, assessor, tax collector and treasurer of each county within which the district is situated, which resolution shall be effective on filing notwithstanding the provisions of Section 47903.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Placing of Delinquent Assessments on County Tax Rolls [47930. - 47930.]

47930.

The board, by resolution, in lieu of enforcing collection of delinquent assessments pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 46670) of this part, may include in the resolution provided by Section 47904 an order directing that all delinquent assessments be transferred to the county tax rolls for collection.

On receipt of the certified copy of the resolution containing such order, the county treasurer shall forthwith close the delinquent rolls and transfer the same to the county auditor whose duty it shall be to compute the amount of the delinquency, with interest and penalties, and add such amounts chargeable against the
 various parcels of land in a column on the county assessment roll designated, “delinquent assessments”, such entry to be made in dollars and cents and to include interest to the date that the payments on the county assessment roll are due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Enforcement of Delinquencies [47960. - 47961.]

47960.

The provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 46670) of this part with reference to the method of collection of assessments shall not be applicable to the collection of assesments under this chapter in the event that the board elects to proceed under Section 47930 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

47961.

The enforcement of the collection of district assessments under this chapter may be had in the same manner and by the same means as provided by law for the enforcement of liens of county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 905.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Collection of Tolls and Charges by the County [47980. - 47982.]

47980.

The district may elect to have the county collect such tolls and charges established pursuant to Section 43006 or 47180 as may be designated by the board. If the district so elects, it shall certify to the county auditor of each affected county on or before the third Monday in August of each year in which the board has elected to have the designated tolls and charges collected by the county, the following information for purposes of such collection:

(a) The total amount estimated to be collected from the entire district.

(b) The assessee parcels
 and assessee names for each parcel of land in the district against whom the toll or charge has been fixed and the acreage assessed to such person according to the district records and the rate or rates per acre of such toll or charge to be paid by each assessee parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

47981.

The county auditor shall thereafter add to the tax bills for each assessee and assessee parcel as so certified, in addition to the other charges, such tolls and charges of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

47982.

The county tax collector and treasurer shall thereupon collect, receive and disperse to the district such tolls and charges as are collected with the regular tax payments to the county. The provisions of Sections 47908 to 47911, inclusive, shall be applicable to any such tolls and charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. CHANGES IN ORGANIZATION [48000. - 48401.]



  CHAPTER 1. Exclusion [48000. - 48087.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition and Notice [48000. - 48004.]

48000.

The holder or holders of title to one or more tracts of land which constitute a portion of a district may jointly or severally file with the board a petition, praying that the tract or tracts, and any other tracts contiguous thereto, may be excluded from the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48001.

The petition shall state the grounds and reasons upon which it is claimed that the land should be excluded and shall describe the boundaries thereof, and also the land of such petitioner or petitioners which is included within the boundaries. The description of the land need not be more particular or certain than is required when the land is entered in the assessment book by the county assessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48002.

The petition shall be acknowledged, and the acknowledgment shall have the same force and effect as evidence as the acknowledgment of a conveyance of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48003.

The board shall cause a notice of the filing of the petition to be published once a week for two successive weeks in some newspaper published in the office county, and in a newspaper published within each other affected county. If no newspaper be published therein, the notice shall be posted for the same time in at least three public places in the district, and one of the notices shall be posted on the land proposed to be excluded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48004.

The notice shall state all of the following:

(a) The filing of the petition.

(b) The names of the petitioners.

(c) A description of the land mentioned in the petition.

(d) The prayer of the petition.

(e) That all interested persons may appear at the office of the board at a time named in the notice and show cause in writing why the change of the boundaries of the district, as proposed in the petition, should not be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing and Order [48025. - 48031.]

48025.

At the time and place provided in the notice of hearing on the exclusion petition published pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter, or at the time to which the hearing may be adjourned, the board shall hear all the following:

(a) The petition.

(b) All evidence or proofs that may be introduced by or on behalf of the petitioners.

(c) All objections to the petition that may be presented in writing by any person showing cause as provided in Article 1 of this chapter.

(d) All evidence or proofs that may be introduced in support of objections to the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48026.

The failure of any person interested in the district, other than the holders of bonds thereof outstanding at the time of the filing of the petition with the board, to show cause, in writing, why the land mentioned in the petition should not be excluded from the district constitutes an assent by him to the exclusion of such land, or any part thereof, from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48027.

The filing of the petition with the board constitutes an assent by each and all of the petitioners to the exclusion from the district of the land mentioned in the petition, or any part thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48028.

The expenses of giving the notice provided for in Article 1 of this chapter and of the hearing on the exclusion petition shall be paid by the persons filing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48029.

Upon the hearing of an exclusion petition the board shall order that the petition be denied:

(a) Entirely when no evidence in support of the petition is introduced.

(b) As to any land described in the petition as to which the evidence introduced fails to sustain the petition.

(c) As to any land described in the petition which the board deems it not for the best interests of the district to exclude, except when the board judges that the land will not be benefited by the operations of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

48030.

The board, after the hearing of any exclusion petition, shall order the exclusion of all or any part of the land described in it when as to the land to be excluded either:

(a) The board judges that the land will not be benefited by the operations of the district.

(b) The board deems the exclusion to be for the best interests of the district and one of the following is true:

(1) No interested person has filed objections in writing showing cause why the land should not be excluded.

(2) All written objections made to the exclusion have been withdrawn.

(3) No written objection made to the exclusion is sustained at the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48031.

No exclusion of land from any district impairs its existence, its rights, including those in or to property, or its obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bondholders’ Assent to Exclusion [48055. - 48057.]

48055.

If there are outstanding bonds of the district at the time of the filing of the exclusion petition, the holders of the outstanding bonds may give their assent, in writing, to the effect that they severally consent that the land mentioned in the petition, or such portion thereof as may be excluded from the district by order of the board, may be excluded from the district. If the land or any portion thereof is thereafter excluded from the district, the land so excluded is released from the lien of such outstanding bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48056.

The assent shall be acknowledged by the several holders of the bonds, and the acknowledgment shall have the same force and effect as evidence as the acknowledgment of a conveyance of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48057.

The assent shall be filed with the board and be recorded in its minutes. The minutes, or a copy thereof, certified by the board, shall be admissible in evidence with the same effect as the assent. The certified copy may be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county wherein the land is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Liability of Excluded Land [48080. - 48087.]

48080.

In the event the board excludes any land from the district upon petition therefor, the board shall make an entry in its minutes describing the boundaries of the district, should the exclusion of the land change its boundaries. For that purpose the board may cause a survey to be made of such portions of the district as it deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

48081.
